Utah statutes.
10-3-1107.   Cost of living adjustment -- Price index used.
(1)  The governing body of each municipality may, in their discretion, adopt a
plan to allow any person who qualifies under this part to receive a cost of
living adjustment in that person's monthly retirement allowance. The
adjustment allowed shall be a percentage, not to exceed 100%, of the sum as
would restore the full purchasing power of each person's original unmodified
pension allowance as it was in the calendar year in which the retirement
giving rise to the pension occurred.
(2)  The amount necessary to restore the full purchasing power of the original
unmodified pension allowance shall be computed from the consumers price index
published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(3)  Adjustments may be effective as of the date of this act or at any
subsequent date set by the governing body. A municipality may choose to pay
any per cent to the maximum amount provided that such percentage be paid to
all qualified persons equally.
